Washington statutes.
RCW 43.114.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Commission" means the Washington state LGBTQ commission.

(2) "LGBTQ" includes lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer communities.

[ 2019 c 395 s 2.]